Illinois, session 104th, HB1275.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 529-3 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/29-3)  (from Ch. 122, par. 29-3)7    Sec. 29-3. Transportation in school districts. School 8boards of community consolidated districts, community unit 9districts, consolidated districts, consolidated high school 10districts, optional elementary unit districts, combined high 11school - unit districts, combined school districts if the 12combined district includes any district which was previously 13required to provide transportation, and any newly created 14elementary or high school districts resulting from a high 15school - unit conversion, a unit to dual conversion, or a 16multi-unit conversion if the newly created district includes 17any area that was previously required to provide 18transportation shall provide free transportation for pupils 19residing at a distance of one and one-half miles or more from 20any school to which they are assigned for attendance 21maintained within the district and for pupils residing at a 22distance of 1/2 mile or more from the school to which they are 23assigned for attendance if the school is located completely or   HB1275- 2 -LRB104 06165 LNS 16199 b1partially within or directly adjacent to an R3 zone, as 2designated by the Illinois Criminal Justice Information 3Authority, and is outside of a county with a population of 43,000,000 or more residents, except for those pupils for whom 5the school board shall certify to the State Board of Education 6that adequate transportation for the public is available.7    For the purpose of this Act, 1 1/2 miles distance or 1/2 8mile distance shall be from the exit of the property where the 9pupil resides to the point where pupils are normally unloaded 10at the school attended; such distance shall be measured by 11determining the shortest distance on normally traveled roads 12or streets.13    Such school board may comply with the provisions of this 14Section by providing free transportation for pupils to and 15from an assigned school and a pick-up point located not more 16than one and one-half miles from the home of each pupil 17assigned to such point or located not more than 1/2 mile from 18the home of each pupil assigned to such point if the school is 19located completely or partially within or directly adjacent to 20a designated R3 zone and is outside of a county with a 21population of 3,000,000 or more residents.22    For the purposes of this Act, "adequate transportation for 23the public" shall be assumed to exist for such pupils as can 24reach school by walking, one way, along normally traveled 25roads or streets less than 1 1/2 miles or less than 1/2 mile if 26the school is located completely or partially within or   HB1275- 3 -LRB104 06165 LNS 16199 b1directly adjacent to a designated R3 zone and is outside of a 2county with a population of 3,000,000 or more residents, 3irrespective of the distance the pupil is transported by 4public transportation.5    In addition to the other requirements of this Section, 6each school board may provide free transportation for any 7pupil residing within 1 1/2 miles from the school attended 8where conditions are such that walking, either to or from the 9school to which a pupil is assigned for attendance or to or 10from a pick-up point or bus stop, constitutes a serious hazard 11to the safety of the pupil due to either (i) vehicular traffic 12or rail crossings or (ii) a course or pattern of criminal 13activity, as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois Streetgang 14Terrorism Omnibus Prevention Act. Such transportation shall 15not be provided if adequate transportation for the public is 16available.17    The determination as to what constitutes a serious safety 18hazard shall be made by the school board, in accordance with 19guidelines promulgated by the Illinois Department of 20Transportation regarding vehicular traffic or rail crossings 21or in accordance with guidelines regarding a course or pattern 22of criminal activity, as determined by the local law 23enforcement agency, in consultation with the State 24Superintendent of Education. A school board, on written 25petition of the parent or guardian of a pupil for whom adequate 26transportation for the public is alleged not to exist because   HB1275- 4 -LRB104 06165 LNS 16199 b1the pupil is required to walk along normally traveled roads or 2streets where walking is alleged to constitute a serious 3safety hazard due to either (i) vehicular traffic or rail 4crossings or (ii) a course or pattern of criminal activity, or 5who is required to walk between the pupil's home and assigned 6school or between the pupil's home or assigned school and a 7pick-up point or bus stop along roads or streets where walking 8is alleged to constitute a serious safety hazard due to either 9(i) vehicular traffic or rail crossings or (ii) a course or 10pattern of criminal activity, shall conduct a study and make 11findings, which the Department of Transportation, with respect 12to vehicular traffic or rail crossings, or the State Board of 13Education, in consultation with the local law enforcement 14agency, with respect to a course or pattern of criminal 15activity, shall review and approve or disapprove as provided 16in this Section, to determine whether a serious safety hazard 17exists as alleged in the petition. The Department of 18Transportation shall review the findings of the school board 19concerning vehicular traffic or rail crossings and shall 20approve or disapprove the school board's determination that a 21serious safety hazard exists within 30 days after the school 22board submits its findings to the Department of 23Transportation. The State Board of Education, in consultation 24with the local law enforcement agency, shall review the 25findings of the school board concerning a course or pattern of 26criminal activity and shall approve or disapprove the school   HB1275- 5 -LRB104 06165 LNS 16199 b1board's determination that a serious safety hazard exists 2within 30 days after the school board submits its findings to 3the State Board. The school board shall annually review the 4conditions and determine whether or not the hazardous 5conditions remain unchanged. The State Superintendent of 6Education may request that the Illinois Department of 7Transportation or the local law enforcement agency verify that 8the conditions have not changed. No action shall lie against 9the school board, the State Superintendent of Education, the 10Illinois Department of Transportation, the State Board of 11Education, or a local law enforcement agency for decisions 12made in accordance with this Section. The provisions of the 13Administrative Review Law and all amendments and modifications 14thereof and the rules adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to 15and govern all proceedings instituted for the judicial review 16of final administrative decisions of the Department of 17Transportation, the State Board of Education, or a local law 18enforcement agency under this Section. At all points, except 19when otherwise mentioned in this Section, the local 20enforcement agency is authorized to determine what constitutes 21a course or pattern of criminal activity. 22    The changes made to this Section by this amendatory Act of 23the 100th General Assembly do not apply to a school district 24organized under Article 34 of this Code. 25(Source: P.A. 100-1142, eff. 11-28-18.)